Florida, session 2026, SB584.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 488.09, Florida Statutes, is created to 16 read: 17 488.09âInteragency agreements with tax collectors.âThe 18 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles may enter into 19 interagency agreements with tax collectors authorizing such tax 20 collectors to enforce this chapter. An interagency agreement 21 entered into under this section is a delegation of the authority 22 of the department to the tax collector. Such an interagency 23 agreement may include, but need not be limited to, grants of 24 authority to the tax collector, or his or her agent, to do any 25 of the following: 26 (1)âProhibit licensees operating commercial driving 27 schools, and their agents, from entering upon the tax 28 collectorâs premises, including its parking areas, unless such 29 licensees and agents are seeking tax collector services in their 30 personal capacities. 31 (2)âProhibit any course of conduct by licensees operating 32 commercial driving schools, and their agents, which operates or 33 would operate as a fraud or deceit upon a person, the 34 department, or the tax collector. 35 (3)âProhibit any transaction, practice, or course of 36 business related to a commercial driving school which undermines 37 the integrity of the driver license issuance process. 38 (4)âRequire persons licensed to operate commercial driving 39 schools, and their agents, to present pertinent licenses, agent 40 identification cards, and certificates issued under this chapter 41 upon demand of a law enforcement officer, a department employee, 42 or an employee of the tax collector. 43 (5)âEnter the premises where a commercial driving school is 44 located to ensure compliance with state and local laws 45 regulating the business of commercial driving schools. 46 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.